District of Columbia statutes.
1-303.03

Regulations for protection of life, health, and property.

The Council of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to make, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized and empowered to enforce, all such reasonable and usual police regulations in addition to those already made under §§ 1-303.01 and 1-303.02, as the Council may deem necessary for the protection of lives, limbs, health, comfort, and quiet of all persons and the protection of all property within the District of Columbia.

History

Feb. 26, 1892, 27 Stat. 394, Res. No. 4, § 2

Cross References

Alcoholic beverage control, regulations for administration and enforcement, see §§ 25-201 and 25-211.
Boxing, rules governing, see § 3-606.
Businesses, rules and regulations for licensing, inspection, or regulation, see § 47-2844.
Department of human services, rules governing, see §§ 7-174 through 7-177.
Discharge of parolees, regulations governing, see § 24-404.
Electricity, regulation of production, use, and control, see § 2-131.
Federal government restaurants, regulations governing, see § 7-2701.
Fire escapes and building safety, rules governing, see § 6-701.04.
Firemen, rules governing, see §§ 5-402, 5-406 and 5-411.
Food and drugs, regulations to prevent adulteration, see § 48-104.
Garbage and other refuse, rules governing collection, see §§ 8-701 and 8-707.
Harbor regulations, see § 22-4401.
Human excreta and waste, rules governing disposal, see § 8-603.
Insurance and insurance companies, regulations governing, see § 31-202.
Lighting of streets and bridges, regulations, see §§ 9-301 and 9-507.
Mattresses, regulations governing manufacture, renovation, and sale, see §§ 8-503 and 8-506.
Medical and dental colleges, regulations for granting licenses and permits to operate, see § 38-1402.
Metropolitan police department, rules governing, see §§ 5-105.05, 5-127.01, 5-133.06, 5-111.01, 5-111.03 5-115.02, and 5-115.05.
Money lenders, rules and regulations governing, see § 26-911.
Motor vehicles, general regulations, see § 50-2201.03.
Motor vehicles, regulations governing registration, see § 50-1501.02.
Municipal fish wharves and markets, regulations governing, see § 37-205.01.
Municipal playgrounds and parks, regulations governing, see §§ 10-127 and 10-137.
Parking, rules governing, see § 6-405.
Plumbing and drainage, regulations, see § 2-135.
Prison labor, regulations governing, see § 24-201.12.
Produce markets, regulations governing, see § 37-201.28.
Public beach and dressing houses, regulations governing, see § 10-162.
Public convenience stations, regulations governing, see § 10-134.
Public utilities, regulations governing, see § 34-809.
Reagan national airport, regulations for administration, see § 9-702.
Repair of streets, alleys and sewers, regulations governing, see § 9-101.01.
Retirement of public school teachers, regulations governing, see § 38-2001.16.
Steam and pressure boilers, regulations, see §§ 2-115 and 2-118.
Taxation, authority to make rules and regulations, see § 47-3407.
Weights and measures, establishment of tolerances and specifications, see §§ 37-201.16a and 37-201.25.
Weights and measures, wood sales, standards, see § 37-201.17.
Zoning regulations, see § 6-641.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-303.05.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-319.
1973 Ed., § 1-226.

New Implementing Regulations

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1978: The “Elimination of the Chest X-Ray Requirement Act of 1977” (D.C. Law 2-39, Feb. 2, 1978, 24 DCR 3175); the “Water Quality Standard Approval Act of 1977” (D.C. Law 2-68, Apr. 6, 1978, 24 DCR 6809); the “Fire Lanes and Fire Hydrants Act of 1977” (D.C. Law 2-90, June 30, 1978, 24 DCR 9759); the “Amended Eligibility Requirements for AFDC by Reason of the Employment of the Father Act of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-97, Aug. 12, 1978, 25 DCR 392); the “District of Columbia Child Development Facilities Regulation Amendment Act of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-98, Aug. 17, 1978, 25 DCR 245); the “Fire Safety Act of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-99, Aug. 17, 1978, 25 DCR 252); and the “Standards of Assistance Relating to Persons Residing in Community Residence Facilities Act of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-108, Sept. 22, 1978, 25 DCR 1453).

Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1979: The “Air Quality Control Regulations Amendment No. 3 of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-133, Mar. 3, 1979, 25 DCR 3490); the “District of Columbia Mental Health Information Act of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-136, Mar. 3, 1979, 25 DCR 5055); the “Air Quality Amendment Act No. II of 1978” (D.C. Law 2-151, Mar. 6, 1979, 25 DCR 2532); and the “Community Residence Facilities Licensure Act Amendments of 1979” (D.C. Law 3-27, Oct. 18, 1979, 26 DCR 667).

Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1981: The “Secondhand Dealers Regulation and Rental Housing Act of 1980 Clarification Act of 1981” (D.C. Law 4-15, July 14, 1981, 28 DCR 2255).

Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1981: The “Intermediate Paramedic Regulations Act of 1981” (D.C. Law 4-25, Aug. 1, 1981, 28 DCR 2622).

Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “Enclosed Sidewalk Cafe Act of 1982” (D.C. Law 4-148, Sept. 17, 1982, 29 DCR 3361).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(4) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.